src/verb-myv-morph.txt
LEXICON kudo-Tenses1_Prep-SG
<"@P.NUM.SG@"> kudo-Tenses1 ;



!LEXICON kit-Tenses1
! kal-Tenses1 ;
!< 0:">" 0:"TLoss" 0:т 0:А2 0:н 0:о "+Use/Sub/Short":0 "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+ScPl1":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
!< 0:">" 0:"TLoss" 0:т 0:А2 0:д 0:о "+Use/Sub/Short":0 "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+ScPl2":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;

!LEXICON kal-Tenses1
! VerbEnd_Clitic ;
! Tenses1_A  ; !This provides a linking vowel


!LEXICON kudo-Tenses1
! VerbEnd_Clitic ;
!< 0:А2 0:н "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+ScSg1":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> VerbEnd_Clitic ;
!< 0:А2 0:т "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+ScSg2":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> VerbEnd_Clitic ;
!< 0:т 0:А2 0:н 0:о "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+ScPl1":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
!< 0:т 0:А2 0:д 0:о "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+ScPl2":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
!< 0:">" 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+ScSg1":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> VerbEnd_Clitic ;
!< 0:">" 0:л 0:и 0:т 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+ScSg2":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> VerbEnd_Clitic ;
!< 0:">" 0:л 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+ScSg3":0 "@U.TPERS.3@" "@D.TNUM.PL@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
!< 0:">" 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:е 0:к "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+ScPl1":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
!< 0:">" 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:е "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+ScPl2":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
!< 0:">" 0:л 0:ь 0:т 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+ScPl3":0 "@U.TPERS.3@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;



LEXICON Tenses1_A
< 0:А2 0:н "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+ScSg1":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:А2 0:т "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+ScSg2":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:т 0:А2 0:н 0:о "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+ScPl1":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:т 0:А2 0:д 0:о "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+ScPl2":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+ScSg1":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:л 0:и 0:т 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+ScSg2":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:л 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+ScSg3":0 "@U.TPERS.3@" "@D.TNUM.PL@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:е 0:к "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+ScPl1":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:е "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+ScPl2":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:л 0:ь 0:т 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+ScPl3":0 "@U.TPERS.3@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;

LEXICON ImpClitic
 # ;

+Clt/Га:%>а # ;
+Clt/Гака:%>ака # ;
+Clt/Гакая:%>акая # ;
+Clt/Гая:%>ая # ;
+Clt/Гаять:%>аять # ;
+Clt/Гаятя:%>аятя # ;
+Clt/Гатя:%>атя # ;
+Clt/Гак:%>ак # ;

!+Clt/Га:%>Г1а # ;
!+Clt/Гака:%>Г1ака # ;
!+Clt/Гакая:%>Г1акая # ;
!+Clt/Гая:%>Г1ая # ;
!+Clt/Гаять:%>Г1аять # ;
!+Clt/Гаятя:%>Г1аятя # ;
!+Clt/Гатя:%>Г1атя # ;
!+Clt/Гак:%>Г1ак # ;

LEXICON VerbEnd_ImpClitic
 # ;
 VerbEnd ;

+Clt/Га:%>Г1а # ;
+Clt/Гака:%>Г1ака # ;
+Clt/Гакая:%>Г1акая # ;
+Clt/Гая:%>Г1ая # ;
+Clt/Гаять:%>Г1аять # ;
+Clt/Гаятя:%>Г1аятя # ;
+Clt/Гак:%>Г1ак # ;

LEXICON VerbEnd_Clitic
 Clitic ;
 VerbEnd ;

LEXICON VerbEnd_lak-Clitic
 lak-Clitic ;
 VerbEnd ;

LEXICON VerbEnd
+SerialVerb:- V ;
